Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
197

GENERAL
PROVISIONS RELATING TO

AQUATIC
RESOURCES AND WILDLIFE

Section

197-1 Definitions

197-2 Animal species advisory commission

197-3 Introduction of aquatic life and wildlife

197-4 Aquatic life and wildlife advisory
committees

197-5 General penalty

Note

L 2014, c 218, §8 purports to amend this chapter.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next